New York, session 2025-2026, A11123.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 476 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 476. First aid kits in small businesses. All businesses with fifty 4 or less employees shall provide equipment and maintain on the premises 5 at all times, a complete first aid kit containing all that equipment 6 reasonably calculated to provide emergency medical aid to injured 7 persons. Such first aid kits shall be stored in a readily accessible 8 location and available for use by any person who enters the premises of 9 the business. 10 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 201 of the public health law is amended 11 by adding a new paragraph (z) to read as follows: 12 (z) supervise and regulate compliance with first aid kit requirements 13 pursuant to section four hundred seventy-six of the labor law. Such 14 compliance shall be visually confirmed and observed in conjunction with 15 any other health or safety inspection performed by the department or by 16 code enforcement personnel, as defined in section three hundred seven- 17 ty-six-a of the executive law; provided, however, that if compliance is 18 confirmed by code enforcement personnel, such personnel shall notify the 19 department of compliance with section four hundred seventy-six of the 20 labor law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09269-01-5